Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB142.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
New Section 1. (a) Each school district board of education may
authorize a teacher representative to serve as a nonvoting member of such
board.
(b) The teacher representative shall be a licensed teacher employed
by the school district and elected by a vote of the teachers employed by
such school district in a manner determined by the board of education of
such school district. The teacher representative shall serve a term of two
years and may be reelected for one additional term. If a vacancy occurs in
the teacher representative position, an interim teacher representative may
be appointed by the board of education until the next teacher
representative election is held. The teacher representative shall not
participate as a board member in any teacher contract negotiations.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 25-2003 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2003. (a) "Board" means the board of education of any unified school
district.
(b) "Board member" and "member" mean a voting member of a board
of education of any unified school district.
(c) "Holdover member" means a voting member, or an appointed
successor to such member, whose term extends for any period before and
two years after the July 1 following a change in method of election under
this act.
(d) "Member position" means one of the seven positions of members
of the board of education when a district method is used, each member
position, except the at-large member position, is numbered.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 72-1072 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
1072. The governing body of a unified school district is and shall be a
board of education composed of seven (7) voting members, except as is
specifically otherwise provided in K.S.A. 72-1210, and amendments
thereto, and may include one nonvoting representative member as

SB 142 2
provided in section 1, and amendments thereto. The voting members may
be elected by any combination of method of election and voting plan
authorized by law, and shall serve for a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-1073 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 72-1073. The provisions of law relating to the term of office of
voting members of boards of education, including method and time of
qualification and of taking office, shall apply to every school district in
this state. In the event no candidate is elected to a position on the board of
education of a school district in a regular election, or if an elected member
moves out of the school district after such member is elected and before
such member takes office the second Monday in January following the
election, or if such member becomes ineligible to serve for any other
reason during that period of time, the holdover member shall continue to
sit as a voting member of the board of education of such school district
until an eligible successor is appointed by the board of education to fill the
position.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 72-1091 is hereby amended to read as follows: 72-
1091. (a) The board of education of any unified school district established
under the provisions of this act shall have seven (7) voting members as
herein provided in this section. Subject to K.S.A. 72-1093, and
amendments thereto, two members of the board of education shall be
nominated and elected by the electors in all of the territory of the unified
school district, and one member of the board of education shall be
nominated and elected by the electors in each of the five member districts
of the unified school district. The members of the board of education shall
each have a position number such that the board member from each
member district shall have the same number that his such member district
bears. Subject to said K.S.A. 72-1093, and amendments thereto, each
member district shall be given one of the numbers one, two, three, four or
five and board member positions of members elected in the entire unified
school district shall be given position number numbers six (6) and seven
(7).
(b) Candidates for voting member of the board of education shall be
qualified electors and reside in the member district bearing the same
number as the member position for which the candidate files, except that
candidates for position numbers six (6) and seven (7), or the position-at-
large only if said K.S.A. 72-1093, and amendments thereto, becomes
operative, shall reside at any place in the unified school district. Upon the
death or resignation of a board member, or upon the removal of his such
member's residence from a member district, a vacancy shall occur in the
board member position of such board member.
(c) One nonvoting representative member may be authorized as
provided in section 1, and amendments thereto.

SB 142 3
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-1133 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 72-1133. (a) At the first meeting of the board of education on or
after the second Monday in January of each year, or at a later meeting
during that calendar year if so determined by the board at the first meeting,
the board shall elect a president and vice-president vice president, both of
whom shall be members of the board. The president and vice-president
vice president shall each serve for a term of one year and until a successor
is elected and qualified.
(b) The president shall preside at meetings of the board and perform
such other duties as are provided by law.
(c) In the absence or inability to act of the president, the vice-
president vice president shall perform the duties of the president. In the
absence or inability to act of both the president and vice-president vice
president, the remaining voting members shall select a member to act in
the capacity of president.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 72-1137 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 72-1137. (a) In addition to the officers provided for in this act, the
board of education of any school district may appoint other officers and
employees to serve at the pleasure of the board. Such officers and
employees shall receive compensation fixed by the board. Members of a
board of education of a school district may receive compensation from the
school district for the work and duties performed by such board members.
(b) Any teacher representative serving as a member of a board of
education pursuant to section 1, and amendments thereto, may receive
compensation from the school district in such teacher representative's
capacity as a teacher and for any work or duties performed as a
representative member of such board. The teacher representative shall not
participate as a board member in any teacher contract negotiations.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 25-2003, 72-1072 and 72-1091 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp.
72-1073, 72-1133 and 72-1137 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 9. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.